Louisiana, session 2026, HB219.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 930.12 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 930.12. Review of sentence; non-unanimous jury verdict
A.(1) The legislature recognizes that non-unanimous jury verdicts in felony
cases have been declared unconstitutional by the Louisiana Supreme Court in State
v. Reddick, 2021-KP-01893 (La. 10/21/22), 351 So.3d 273. The Louisiana Supreme
Court determined that the rule of Ramos v. Louisiana, 590 U.S. 83 (2020), is not
retroactively applicable on state post-conviction review. The legislature recognizes
that sentences imposed upon convictions returned by non-unanimous juries were
imposed without consideration of the constitutional infirmity and diminished
reliability of such verdicts and that the Louisiana Supreme Court expressly noted that
the legislature may determine that a broader subset of individuals are eligible for
post-conviction review.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-321 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 219
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to provide to those defendants having
non-unanimous jury convictions, who received the maximum allowable sentence
under the law, an opportunity for review of their sentence for a determination of
whether the defendant received an excessive sentence as a matter of law.
B.(1) The provisions of this Article apply to any defendant who is presently
serving a sentence of imprisonment, whether incarcerated or on parole supervision,
for a felony conviction returned by a non-unanimous jury verdict.
(2) The provisions of this Article do not apply to any conviction for which
the imposed sentence has been fully served.
C.(1)(a) A defendant may seek review of a sentence based on a non-
unanimous jury verdict by filing a motion for resentencing in the district court in
which the conviction was obtained no later than August 1, 2027.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Code of Criminal Procedure Article
930.4(D), the court may vacate a sentence and impose a new sentence.
(c) Any opposition to the motion and all documents in support of the
opposition shall be filed and served in accordance with Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1313(A)(4) by the district attorney not less than thirty days from the date the
motion is filed.
(d) If the court finds that the movant was convicted of a felony, that the
verdict was non-unanimous, that the movant is still under sentence, and that the
district attorney has not noticed an intent to retry the movant, the court shall order
a resentencing hearing.
(2)(a) Unless otherwise agreed to by all of the parties and the court:
(i) A contradictory hearing on the motion for resentencing shall be set not
less than sixty days after the filing.
(ii) Notice of the hearing date shall be served on all parties and the victim
in accordance with Code of Civil Procedure Articles 1313(C) or 1314 not less than
thirty days prior to the hearing. The victim has the right to be present and to submit
written or oral impact statements.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-321 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 219
(b) For good cause shown, the court may order a continuance of the hearing.
(c) In all cases, the court shall state on the record or in writing the reasons
for granting or denying the motion. If an appealable judgment is rendered, a party
may request written reasons for judgment as provided in Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1917.
D.(1) The court shall conduct a full resentencing hearing as is necessary for
the court to impose a particularly tailored legal sentence.
(2)(a) After consideration of all evidence, if the court grants the motion, the
court shall vacate the original sentence and impose a new sentence.
(b) For any conviction for which no responsive verdict is provided pursuant
to Article 814, the court shall impose a sentence of imprisonment of not less than
twenty years and not more than forty years.
(3)(a) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a new sentence that is no
greater than the maximum term of imprisonment authorized at the time of conviction
for the most serious lesser included offense of which the defendant could have been
convicted as set forth in Article 814 is proper.
(b) The district attorney may rebut the presumption by establishing, by clear
and convincing evidence, that a sentence equal to one and one-half times the
maximum sentence for the most serious lesser included offense is warranted and is
not excessive.
(4) No sentence imposed pursuant to this Article shall be enhanced nor used
to enhance any prior conviction as a habitual offender.
(5) The defendant shall receive full credit for all time served.
(6) The court may set the provisions deemed appropriate regarding parole
eligibility and may grant parole eligibility for any sentence that the court deems
appropriate.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-321 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 219